Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1790
Loan documentation.

Except as provided in section 21-1793, every application for a loan shall be made in writing upon a form prescribed by the credit union. All loan obligations shall be evidenced by a written document.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 90.